Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE G. LICENSES AND OTHER REGULATION

CHAPTER 144. RENDERERS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 144.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Dead animal" means the whole or substantially whole carcass of a dead or fallen domestic animal, or domesticated wild animal, that was not slaughtered for human consumption.

(2) "Dead animal hauler" means a person who collects and disposes of dead animals for commercial purposes.

(3) "Disposal" means the burying, burning, cooking, processing, or rendering of dead animals or of renderable raw materials.

(4) "Employee" means a person who:

(A) is a legal employee of a rendering establishment; and

(B) handles or operates rendering equipment, utensils, containers, vehicles, or packaging materials owned or leased by the rendering establishment.

(5) "Nuisance" means any situation or condition that constitutes a nuisance under Section 341.011.

(6) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation, trust, company, or organization, and includes an agent, officer, or employee of that individual or entity.

(7) "Processing" means an operation or combination of operations through which materials derived from a dead animal or renderable raw material sources are:

(A) prepared for disposal at a rendering establishment;

(B) stored; or

(C) treated for commercial use or disposition, other than as food for human consumption.

(8) "Related station" means an operation or facility that is necessary or incidental to the operation of a rendering establishment and that is operated or maintained separately from the rendering establishment.

(9) "Rendering business" means the collection, transportation, disposal, or storage of dead animals or renderable raw materials for commercial purposes at locations where dead animals or renderable raw materials are rendered, boiled, processed, stored, transferred, or otherwise prepared, either as a separate business or in connection with any other established business.

(10) "Rendering establishment" means an establishment or part of an establishment, a plant, or any other premises at which dead animals or renderable raw materials are rendered, boiled, processed, or otherwise prepared to obtain a product for commercial use or disposition, other than as food for human consumption. The term includes all other operations and facilities that are necessary or incidental to the establishment.

(11) "Renderable raw material" means any unprocessed or partially processed material of animal or plant origin, other than a dead animal, that is processed by rendering establishments. The term includes:

(A) animals, poultry, or fish slaughtered or processed for human consumption but that are unsuitable for that use;

(B) the inedible products and by-products of animals, poultry, or fish slaughtered or processed for human consumption;

(C) parts from dead animals;

(D) whole or partial carcasses of dead poultry or fish;

(E) waste cooking greases; and

(F) recyclable cooking oil.

(12) "Recyclable cooking oil" means any unprocessed or partially processed grease, fat, or oil previously used in the cooking or preparation of food for human consumption and intended for recycling by being used or reused as:

(A) an ingredient in a process to make a product; or

(B) an effective substitute for a commercial product.

(13) "Renderable raw material hauler" means a person who collects or transports renderable raw materials for commercial purposes.

(14) "Transfer station" means a facility at which renderable raw materials are transferred from one conveyance to another.

(15) "Waste cooking grease" means any unprocessed or partially processed grease, fat, or oil previously used in the cooking or preparation of food for human consumption and no longer suitable for such use.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 485, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 144.003. CONSTRUCTION OF OTHER LAWS. (a) This chapter does not affect:

(1) Chapter 141, Agriculture Code; or

(2) any state law or a rule of any public regulatory body that relates to the control of water or air pollution.

(b) This chapter does not affect a municipality's power to regulate by ordinance rendering businesses within the boundaries of the municipality. However, each rendering establishment, related station, transfer station, dead animal hauler, or renderable raw material hauler subject to a municipal ordinance shall comply with this chapter.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 485, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER C. OPERATING PROCEDURES

Sec. 144.021. GENERAL REQUIREMENTS FOR RENDERING OPERATIONS. Each rendering establishment, related station, transfer station, dead animal hauler, or renderable raw material hauler shall adopt operating procedures that:

(1) provide for the sanitary performance of rendering operations and processes;

(2) prevent the spread of infectious or noxious materials; and

(3) ensure that finished products are free from disease-producing organisms.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 485, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0416, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 3.005, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 144.022. RECORDS. (a) Each rendering establishment, related station, or dead animal hauler shall have a dead animal log that meets the requirements prescribed by department rule. The name of the rendering establishment, related station, or dead animal hauler must be on the front of the log.

(b) A rendering establishment, related station, or dead animal hauler that receives a dead animal shall enter the following information in the log:

(1) the date and time of the pickup of the dead animal;

(2) the name of the driver of the collection vehicle;

(3) a description of the dead animal;

(4) the location of the dead animal, including the county; and

(5) the owner of the dead animal, if known.

(c) The rendering establishment, related station, or dead animal hauler shall also keep a record in the log, or in an appendix to the log, of the general route followed in making the collection.

(d) The log is subject to inspection at all reasonable times by the department or a person with written authorization from the department.

(e) This section does not apply to a renderable raw material hauler.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0417, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 3.006, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 144.023. VEHICLES. (a) A vehicle used to transport dead animals or renderable raw materials to or from a rendering establishment must:

(1) be leak-proof and maintained in a manner that precludes the creation of a nuisance; and

(2) comply with each applicable requirement for operation on the public roads or highways, including applicable insurance requirements and gross vehicle weight limitations.

(b) A collection vehicle shall be held to a minimum number of stops, and the stops shall be brief, while traveling to the establishment with dead animals or renderable raw materials. Each collection vehicle shall be washed and sanitized at the end of each day's operations.

(c) A truck bed used to transport dead animals or renderable raw materials shall be thoroughly washed and sanitized before use for the transport of finished rendered products. A truck bed used to transport dead animals or renderable raw materials to a rendering establishment, or to transfer finished rendered products from an establishment, shall, before being used to transport any product intended for human consumption, be thoroughly sanitized with a bactericidal agent that is safe for use in a rendering establishment. A truck bed may not be used to transport dead animals or renderable raw materials at the same time the truck bed or any part of the truck bed is used to transport any product intended for human consumption, notwithstanding the manner in which part of the truck bed is sealed or separated from the remainder of the bed.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 3.030(3), eff. September 1, 2015.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 3.030(3), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 485, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 3.007, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 3.008, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 3.030(3), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 144.024. TREATMENT OF DEAD ANIMALS OR RENDERABLE RAW MATERIALS. (a) Dead animals or renderable raw materials received by a rendering establishment shall either be immediately placed in the rendering process or stored for not more than 48 hours in a manner that precludes the creation of a nuisance or a malodorous condition.

(b) Cooking or other dehydration operations shall be conducted in a manner that prevents the survival of disease-producing organisms in the processed material. Adequate and suitable means for the treatment of cooking vapors shall be provided and operated in a manner that controls odors.

(c) All cooked or finished materials shall be kept apart from areas where dead animals or renderable raw materials are kept in a manner that prevents contamination.

(d) If a person intends to use oil or grease as an ingredient in livestock feed or in topical cosmetic products, the person may not contaminate or commingle waste cooking greases or recyclable cooking oils with grease trap waste, grit trap waste, or any other substance that would render the greases or oils harmful or otherwise unsuitable for use as an ingredient in livestock feed or in topical cosmetic products.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 485, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 144.025. FLOORS. (a) During operations, the floors in processing areas shall be kept reasonably free from processing wastes, including:

(1) blood;

(2) manure;

(3) scraps;

(4) grease;

(5) water;

(6) dirt; and

(7) litter.

(b) The floors shall be thoroughly cleaned at the end of each day's operations.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 144.026. WASTE TREATMENT. (a) Waste shall be handled and disposed of in a manner that prevents contamination of:

(1) the water supply;

(2) processing equipment;

(3) packaging materials; and

(4) finished products.

(b) Liquid waste shall be treated in the manner required by the department and disposed of in a manner approved by department rule.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0418, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 144.027. EMPLOYEE FACILITIES. (a) Adequate and convenient toilet facilities for employees shall be located in an establishment.

(b) An adequate number of lavatory facilities for employees to wash their hands shall be provided at convenient locations in the establishment and must be supplied with warm water under pressure and with soap or another detergent.

(c) A drinking water supply shall be provided at convenient locations in the establishment for the use of employees.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 3.009, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 144.028. HYGIENE REQUIREMENTS. A person engaging in rendering processes or operations shall wear washable garments and accessories and conform to hygienic practices.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 144.029. SANITARY CONDITIONS REQUIRED. (a) The premises of a rendering establishment shall be kept clean and neat, in good repair, and reasonably free from:

(1) undue collection of refuse;

(2) waste materials;

(3) rodent infestation;

(4) insect breeding places;

(5) standing water; and

(6) other objectionable conditions.

(b) Equipment and utensils shall be provided as necessary for the rendering establishment to conduct operations in a sanitary manner.

(c) Rodents, roaches, and other vermin shall be controlled.

(d) Hide storage facilities shall be in closed areas separate from all other areas.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 144.030. COLLECTION CONTAINER REQUIREMENTS. (a) A container in which dead animals or renderable raw materials are accumulated by a producer at collecting points for pickup by a dead animal hauler or renderable raw material hauler must remain on the premises at each collecting point.

(b) The owner of the containers shall maintain the containers in a leak-proof and sanitary condition and shall replace them as necessary.

(c) The transportation, delivery, transfer, loading, and off-loading of dead animals and renderable raw materials shall be performed in a manner that prevents the release of animal parts and spills or leaks of renderable raw materials from containers. A release of dead animal parts or spill or leak of renderable raw materials shall immediately be cleaned up and reported in the log required by Section 144.022.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 485, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER G. ADMINISTRATIVE AND ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS; PENALTIES

Sec. 144.078. INJUNCTION. (a) The attorney general may bring an action in any district court of this state that has jurisdiction and venue for an injunction to compel compliance with this chapter or to restrain any actual or threatened violation of this chapter.

(b) The court may enter an order or judgment to award a preliminary or final injunction as it considers appropriate.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 3.030(15), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 485, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 3.010, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 3.030(15), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 144.079. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) A person may not receive, hold, slaughter, butcher, or otherwise process any animal as food for human consumption in a building or compartmented area of a building used as a rendering establishment or related station.

(b) A person may not steal, misappropriate, contaminate, or damage recyclable cooking oil or containers of recyclable cooking oil.

(c) A renderer, hauler, or any other person may not knowingly take possession of stolen recyclable cooking oil.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 485, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 3.011, eff. September 1, 2015.